Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 152A Energy

152A.010.
Department of energy — Functions — Commissioner. [Repealed.]

152A.011.
Energy Cabinet — Secretary. [Repealed.]

152A.020.
Duties and functions of department. [Repealed.]

152A.030.
Department of energy research and department of energy production and utilization. [Repealed.]

152A.040.
Department of energy organizational units. [Repealed.]

152A.050.
Advisory council for energy and natural resources — Function — Members — Terms — Officers — Vacancies. [Repealed.]

152A.060.
Energy research board — Members — Terms — Officers — Meetings — Duties — Staff — Compensation. [Repealed.]

152A.070.
Office of energy policy and evaluation — Functions. [Repealed.]

152A.080.
Office of Administration — Functions. [Repealed.]

152A.090.
Department of energy research and development — Divisions. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.100.
Research program. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.110.
Bureau of energy conservation and distribution — Duties — Divisions. [Repealed.]

152A.120.
Energy resource information. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.125.
Organization of department of energy production and utilization. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.127.
Small coal operators advisory council. [Repealed.]

152A.130.
Internal organization of departments. [Repealed.]

152A.140.
Personnel. [Repealed.]

152A.150.
Transfer of funds, personnel and equipment. [Repealed.]

152A.160.
Existing rules and regulations in effect until modified. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.170.
Administration of state and federally funded programs. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152A.180.
Administrative regulations. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]